Utah statutes.
59-2-1502.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Manufactured home" is as defined in Section 41-1a-102.

(2)  "Mobile home" is as defined in Section 41-1a-102.

(3)  "Transportable factory-built housing unit" means a:

(a)  mobile home; or

(b)  manufactured home.

(4)  "Transportable factory-built housing unit park" means any tract of land on which two or more unit spaces are:

(a)  leased;

(b)  rented; or

(c)  offered for:

(i)  lease; or

(ii)  rent.

(5)  "Unit space" means a specific area of land within a transportable factory-built housing unit park that is designed to accommodate one transportable factory-built housing unit for residential purposes.



Enacted by Chapter 243, 2004 General Session

